Maryland, session 2026, HB1450.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Insurance
15–1005.1.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1450*

HOUSE BILL 1450
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CARRIER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 15–1008 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(3) “PAYOR” MEANS A CARRIER, THE MARYLAND MEDICAL
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM, OR THE MEDICARE PROGRAM.
(B) IF A CLAIM IS SUBMITTED TO A CARRIER AND IS SUBJECT TO
COORDINATION OF BENEFITS WITH ANOTHER PAYOR, THE CARRIER SHALL BE
RESPONSIBLE FOR:
(1) IDENTIFYING THE PRIMARY AND SECONDARY PAYORS;
(2) IDENTIFYING THE AMOUNTS PAYABLE BY EACH PAYOR; AND
(3) COORDINATING ITS BENEFITS WITH THE BENEFITS OF THE OTHER
PAYORS BY DETERMINING THE ORDER OF PAYMENTS AND ENSURING THAT
COMBINED PAYMENTS DO NOT EXCEED 100% OF THE TOTAL CLAIM.
(C) EACH CARRIER SHALL SUBMIT AN ANNUAL REPORT ON ITS ACTIVITIES
UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE COMMISSIONER IN THE FORM REQUIRED BY THE
COMMISSIONER.
15–1008.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Carrier” means:
(i) an insurer;
(ii) a nonprofit health service plan;
(iii) a health maintenance organization;
(iv) a dental plan organization;
(v) a managed care organization, as defined in § 15–101 of the
Health – General Article; or
(vi) any other person that provides health benefit plans subject to
regulation by the State.

HOUSE BILL 1450 3
(3) “Code” means:
(i) the applicable current procedural terminology (CPT) code, as
adopted by the American Medical Association;
(ii) if for a dental service, the applicable code adopted by the
American Dental Association; or
(iii) another applicable code under an appropriate uniform coding
scheme used by a carrier in accordance with this section.
(4) “Coding guidelines” means those standards or procedures used or
applied by a payor to determine the most accurate and appropriate code or codes for
payment by the payor for a service or services.
(5) “Health care provider” means a person or entity licensed, certified or
otherwise authorized under the Health Occupations Article or the Health – General Article
to provide health care services.
(6) “Reimbursement” means payments made to a health care provider by a
carrier on either a fee–for–service, capitated, or premium basis.
(b) This section does not apply to an adjustment to reimbursement:
(1) made as part of an annual contracted reconciliation of a risk sharing
arrangement under an administrative service provider contract; or
(2) made as part of a two–sided incentive arrangement that complies with
§ 15–113 of this title.
(c) (1) If a carrier retroactively denies reimbursement to a health care
provider, the carrier:
(i) SUBJECT TO ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, MAY ONLY
RETROACTIVELY DENY REIMBURSEMENT FOR SERVICES SUBJECT TO
COORDINATION OF BENEFITS WITH ANOTHER CARRIER DURING THE 9–MONTH
PERIOD AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE CARRIER PAID THE HEALTH CARE
PROVIDER;
(II) may only retroactively deny reimbursement for services subject
to coordination of benefits with [another carrier,] the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program[,] or the Medicare Program during the 18–month period after the date that the
carrier paid the health care provider; and

HOUSE BILL 1450
[(ii)] (III) except as provided in [item (i)] ITEMS (I) AND (II) of this
paragraph, may only retroactively deny reimbursement during the 6–month period after
the date that the carrier paid the health care provider.
(2) (i) A carrier that retroactively denies reimbursement to a health
care provider under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall provide the health care provider
with a written statement specifying the basis for the retroactive denial.
(ii) If the retroactive denial of reimbursement results from
coordination of benefits by a carrier that is not a managed care organization, the written
statement shall provide the name and address of the entity acknowledging responsibility
for payment of the denied claim.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, a carrier that does not
comply with the provisions of subsection (c) of this section may not retroactively deny
reimbursement or attempt in any manner to retroactively collect reimbursement already
paid to a health care provider.
(e) (1) The provisions of subsection (c)(1) of this section do not apply if a carrier
retroactively denies reimbursement to a health care provider because:
(i) the information submitted to the carrier was fraudulent;
(ii) the information submitted to the carrier was improperly coded
and the carrier has provided to the health care provider sufficient information regarding
the coding guidelines used by the carrier at least 30 days prior to the date the services
subject to the retroactive denial were rendered;
(iii) the claim submitted to the carrier was a duplicate claim; or
(iv) for a claim submitted to a managed care organization, the claim
was for services provided to a Maryland Medical Assistance Program recipient during a
time period for which the Program has permanently retracted the capitation payment for
the Program recipient from the managed care organization.
(2) Information submitted to the carrier may be considered to be
improperly coded under paragraph (1) of this subsection if the information submitted to the
carrier by the health care provider:
(i) uses codes that do not conform with the coding guidelines used
by the carrier applicable as of the date the service or services were rendered; or
(ii) does not otherwise conform with the contractual obligations of
the health care provider to the carrier applicable as of the date the service or services were
rendered.

HOUSE BILL 1450 5
(f) If a carrier retroactively denies reimbursement for services as a result of
coordination of benefits under provisions of subsection (c)(1)(i) OR (II) of this section, the
health care provider shall have 6 months from the date of denial, unless a carrier permits
a longer time period, to submit a claim for reimbursement for the service to the carrier,
Maryland Medical Assistance Program, or Medicare Program responsible for payment.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.